Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201650-417
Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee;
public retirement systems; existing or proposed; duties.

The
Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee shall study any legislative proposal,
bill, or amendment, other than an amendment proposed by the Committee on Enrollment
and Review, affecting any public retirement system, existing or proposed,
established by the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision thereof
and report electronically the
results of such study to the Legislature, which report shall, when applicable,
include an actuarial analysis and cost estimate and the recommendation of
the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee regarding passage of any bill or
amendment. To assist the committee in the performance of such duties, the
committee may consult with and utilize the services of any officer, department,
or agency of the state and may from time to time engage the services of a
qualified and experienced actuary. In the absence of any report from such
committee, the Legislature shall consider requests from groups seeking to
have retirement plans established for them and such other proposed legislation
as is pertinent to existing retirement systems.

Laws 1959, c. 243, § 2, p. 832;

Laws 1989, LB 189, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB10, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 77.